Maine, session 132, LD957.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 20-A MRSA §4706, as amended by PL 2023, c. 537, §§1 and 2, is further
amended to read:
§4706. Instruction in American history, African American studies, Maine studies,
Wabanaki studies and the, history of genocide and Asian American, Native
Hawaiian and Pacific Islander history
Instruction in American history, African American studies, government, citizenship,
Maine studies and, the history of genocide and Asian American, Native Hawaiian and
Pacific Islander history must be aligned with the parameters for essential instruction and
graduation requirements established under section 6209.
1. American history. American history, government and citizenship, including the
United States Constitution, the Declaration of Independence, the importance of voting and
the privileges and responsibilities of citizenship, must be taught in and required for
graduation from all elementary and secondary schools, both public and private. African
American studies and Asian American, Native Hawaiian and Pacific Islander history must
be included in the review of content standards and performance indicators of the system of
learning results conducted in accordance with section 6209, subsection 4.
2. Maine studies. Maine history, including the Constitution of Maine, Maine
geography and environment and the natural, industrial and economic resources of Maine
and Maine's cultural and ethnic heritage, must be taught. A required component of Maine
studies is Wabanaki studies, and Wabanaki studies may be taught as a component of other
content areas, as appropriate, including but not limited to the content areas of English
language arts, mathematics, science and fine arts. Wabanaki studies, Maine Asian
American, Native Hawaiian and Pacific Islander history and Maine African American
studies must be included in the review of content standards and performance indicators of
the learning results conducted in accordance with section 6209, subsection 4. Wabanaki
studies must address the following topics:
Page 1 - 132LR0883(03)

A. Wabanaki governments and political systems and their relationship with local, state,
national and international governments;
B. Wabanaki cultural systems and the experience of tribal people throughout history;
C. Wabanaki territories; and
D. Wabanaki economic systems.
3. History of genocide. The history of genocide, including the Holocaust, must be
included in the review of content standards and performance indicators of the system of
learning results conducted in accordance with section 6209, subsection 4.
4. Asian American, Native Hawaiian and Pacific Islander history. Asian
American, Native Hawaiian and Pacific Islander history instruction pursuant to subsections
1 and 2 must consider, but is not limited to:
A. The history of Asian Americans, Native Hawaiians and Pacific Islanders in the
State, the region and the United States; and
B. The contributions of:
(1) Asian Americans, Native Hawaiians and Pacific Islanders toward
advancing civil rights from the 19th century to the present day;
(2) Individual Asian Americans, Native Hawaiians and Pacific Islanders in
government, the arts, humanities and sciences; and
(3) Asian American, Native Hawaiian and Pacific Islander communities to the
economic, cultural, social and political development of the United States.
As used in this section, "Asian American, Native Hawaiian and Pacific Islander
history" includes, but is not limited to, the history of Americans of East Asian, Southeast
Asian, Native Hawaiian and Pacific Islander descent.
Sec. 2. Resource development; advisory group; curriculum audit; report.
The Department of Education is responsible for fulfilling the requirements of this section.
1. Development of resources. The department shall identify and make available to
schools resources and materials for teaching Asian American, Native Hawaiian and Pacific
Islander history, including Maine Asian American, Native Hawaiian and Pacific Islander
history, pursuant to the Maine Revised Statutes, Title 20-A, section 4706, subsection 4.
2. Advisory group. The department shall, within 30 days after the effective date of this
Act, convene a volunteer advisory group to collect information and prepare materials for
the teaching of Asian American, Native Hawaiian and Pacific Islander history. The
advisory group must include scholars of Asian American, Native Hawaiian and Pacific
Islander history and culture; representatives from Asian American, Native Hawaiian and
Pacific Islander civil rights organizations in the State; Asian American, Native Hawaiian
and Pacific Islander history and cultural organizations; the State Archivist; and members
of the public with personal experience that would inform the collection of information and
the preparation of materials under this section. The department shall include at least one
member from the advisory group in any group or committee convened to review the
parameters for essential instruction and graduation requirements for social studies pursuant
to the Maine Revised Statutes, Title 20-A, section 6209, subsection 4.
Page 2 - 132LR0883(03)

3. Guidance; best practices; exemplar modules. The department shall develop
guidance, best practices and exemplar modules to support the integration of Asian
American, Native Hawaiian and Pacific Islander history into the instruction of American
history and Maine history.
4. Curriculum audit. The department shall develop a process that supports and
enables a local school administrative unit to conduct an internal audit of its curriculum to
ensure an equitable representation of Asian American, Native Hawaiian and Pacific
Islander voices and an accurate historical account of Asian American, Native Hawaiian and
Pacific Islander history and culture.
5. Reporting. The department shall submit a report on the progress of the
implementation of this Act to the Joint Standing Committee on Education and Cultural
Affairs matters no later than April 1, 2030.
Sec. 3. Appropriations and allocations. The following appropriations and
allocations are made.
EDUCATION, DEPARTMENT OF
Innovative Teaching and Learning Z394
Initiative: Provides one-time funds for the cost of convening the advisory group to collect
information and prepare materials for the teaching of Asian American, Native Hawaiian
and Pacific Islander history.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $15,000 $0
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $15,000 $0
Sec. 4. Effective date. That section of this Act that amends the Maine Revised
Statutes, Title 20-A, section 4706 takes effect July 1, 2029 or at the start of the next major
substantive rule review initiated pursuant to Title 20-A, section 6209, subsection 4
following the general effective date of laws enacted during the First Special Session of the
132nd Legislature, whichever is sooner. The Commissioner of Education shall notify the
Secretary of State, the Secretary of the Senate, the Clerk of the House of Representatives
and the Revisor of Statutes of the date of the start of the next major substantive rule review
initiated pursuant to Title 20-A, section 6209, subsection 4 following the general effective
date of laws enacted during the First Special Session of the 132nd Legislature.
Page 3 - 132LR0883(03)